Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1235
Bridge commission; accounts; audits.

The accounts and statements of the bridge commission of a city of the metropolitan class shall be audited by or under the direction of the city comptroller semiannually and finally upon the completion of the work of the bridge commission and at such other times as may be directed by the city council. The cost of such audit shall be charged against the funds provided for in sections 14-1201 to 14-1252.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 15, p. 625;

C.S.1929, § 14-1215;

R.S.1943, § 14-1235;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 268.
July 21, 2022